Utah statutes.
20A-1-701.   Prosecutions -- Venue.
Violations of the provisions of this title concerning expenditure of money or
making contributions or providing services may be prosecuted in the county
where the expenditure or contribution was made, or where the services were
provided, or in any county where the money was paid or distributed.
